Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.04.010 and 2024 c 146 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public offices, positions, or employment, either the state, and all of its political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the competitive examinations shall give a scoring criteria status to all veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007 and federal employees as defined in subsection (3) of this section, by adding to the passing mark, grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:(((1)))(a) Ten percent to a veteran who served during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;(((2)))(b) Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;(((3)))(c) Five percent to a veteran who was called to active military service from employment with the state or any of its political subdivisions or municipal corporations. The percentage shall be added to promotional examinations until the first promotion only;(((4)))(d) Five percent to a federal employee. The percentage shall be added to promotional examinations until the first promotion only.(2) All veterans' scoring criteria may be claimed:(a) Upon release from active military service with a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005; or(b) Upon receipt of a United States department of defense discharge document DD form 214, NGB form 22, or their equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that characterizes his or her discharge as a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005.(3) As used in this section, "federal employee" means an employee of the federal government who was separated from federal service under Executive Order 14210, 90 Fed. Reg. 9669 (February 11, 2025), or voluntarily separated from federal service because of the termination of remote work arrangements under Presidential Memorandum 90 Fed. Reg. 8251 (January 20, 2025).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) In every state agency, federal employees shall be preferred for appointment and employment.(2) As used in this section:(a) "Federal employee" has the meaning defined in RCW 41.04.010(3).(b) "State agency" means any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other agency of the state of Washington.--- END ---